Hawaii statutes.
§261-21 Penalties. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c), any person violating this chapter, or any of the
rules or orders issued pursuant thereto and relating to:

(1) Safety measures, practices, or requirements;

(2) Airport security measures or requirements; or

(3) The licensing and regulation of persons engaged
in commercial activities at public airports,

duly adopted or served, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), any
person violating any rule relating to motor vehicles and traffic control or the
operation of any equipment or motor vehicle in or on the operational area of
the airport shall be guilty of an offense as defined under the Penal Code and
be fined not more than $500.

(c) Any person violating any rule relating to
parking of motor vehicles or equipment at a public airport, including baggage
carts, dollies, and other similar devices, shall have committed a traffic
infraction as set forth in chapter 291D, the adjudication of which shall be
subject to the provisions contained therein. [L 1947, c 32, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§15-24; HRS §261-21; am L 1980, c 155, §2; am L 1996, c 37, §1; am L 1997, c
68, §1; am L 2008, c 101, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next